es: Explosivo
en: Explosive
da: Eksplosiv
de: Explosionsgefährlich
el: Εκρηκτικό
fi: Räjähtävä
fr: Explosif
it: Esplosivo
nl: Ontplofbaar
pt: Explosivo
ru: Взрывоопасно, Взрывчатые вещества и изделия, Взрывчатые вещества, Неустойчивые взрывчатые вещества
sv: Explosivt

de: In trockenem Zustand explosionsgefährlich, R1
en: Explosive when dry, R1
cs: Výbušný v suchém stavu, R1
dk: Eksplosiv i tør tilstand, R1
el: Εκρηκτικό σε ξηρή κατάσταση, R1
es: Explosivo en estado seco, R1
et: Plahvatusohtlik kuivana, R1
fi: Räjähtävää kuivana, R1
fr: Explosif à l'état sec, R1
hu: Száraz állapotban robbanásveszélyes, R1
it: Esplosivo allo stato secco, R1
lt: Sausa gali sprogti, R1
lv: Sprādzienbīstams sausā veidā, R1
mt: Jisplodi meta jinxef, R1
nl: In droge toestand ontplofbaar, R1
no: Eksplosjonsfarlig i tørr tilstand, R1
pl: Produkt wybuchowy w stanie suchym, R1
pt: Explosivo no estado seco, R1
ru: Взрывоопасно в сухом состоянии
sk: V suchom stave výbušný, R1
sl: Eksplozivno v suhem stanju, R1
sv: Explosivt i torrt tillstånd, R1

es: Comburente
en: Oxidising
da: Brandnærende
de: Brandfördernd
el: Οξειδωτικό
fi: Hapettava
fr: Comburant
it: Comburente
nl: Oxiderend
pt: Comburente
ru: Окислитель, Окисляющие вещества, Окисляющие газы, Окисляющие жидкости, Окисляющие твёрдые вещества
sv: Oxiderande

es: Corrosivo
en: Corrosive
da: Ætsende
de: Ätzend
el: Διαβρωτικό
fi: Syövyttävä
fr: Corrosif
it: Corrosivo
nl: Bijtend
pt: Corrosivo
sv: Frätande

es: Peligroso para el medio ambiente
en: Dangerous for the environment
da: Miljøfarlig
de: Umweltgefährlich
el: Επικίνδυνο για το περιβάλλον
fi: Ympäristölle vaarallinen
fr: Dangereux pour l'environnement
it: Pericoloso per l'ambiente
nl: Milieugevaarlijk
pt: Perigoso para o ambiente
sv: Miljöfarlig

de: Entzündlich, R10
en: Flammable, R10
cs: Hořlavý, R10
dk: Brandfarlig, R10
el: Εύφλεκτο, R10
es: Inflamable, R10
et: Tuleohtlik, R10
fi: Syttyvää, R10
fr: Inflammable, R10
hu: Kis mértékben tűzveszélyes, R10
it: Infiammabile, R10
lt: Degi, R10
lv: Uzliesmojošs, R10
mt: Jieħu n-nar, R10
nl: Ontvlambaar, R10
no: Brannfarlig, R10
pl: Produkt łatwopalny, R10
pt: Inflamável, R10
sk: Horl’avý, R10
sl: Vnetljivo, R10
sv: Brandfarligt, R10

de: Leichtentzündlich, R11
en: Highly flammable, R11
cs: Vysoce hořlavý, R11
dk: Meget brandfarlig, R11
el: Πολύ εύφλεκτο, R11
es: Fácilmente inflamable, R11
et: Väga tuleohtlik, R11
fi: Helposti syttyvää, R11
fr: Facilement inflammable, R11
hu: Tűzveszélyes, R11
it: Facilmente infiammabile, R11
lt: Labai degi, R11
lv: Viegli uzliesmojošs, R11
mt: Jieħu n-nar malajr, R11
nl: Licht ontvlambaar, R11
no: Meget brannfarlig, R11
pl: Produkt wysoce łatwopalny, R11
pt: Facilmente inflamável, R11
sk: Vel’mi horl’avý, R11
sl: Lahko vnetljivo, R11
sv: Mycket brandfarligt, R11

de: Hochentzündlich, R12
en: Extremely flammable, R12
cs: Extrémně hořlavý, R12
dk: Yderst brandfarlig, R12
el: Εξαιρετικά εύφλεκτο, R12
es: Extremadamente inflamable, R12
et: Eriti tuleohtlik, R12
fi: Erittäin helposti syttyvää, R12
fr: Extrêmement inflammable, R12
hu: Fokozottan tűzveszélyes, R12
it: Estremamente infiammabile, R12
lt: Ypač degi, R12
lv: Īpaši viegli uzliesmojošs, R12
mt: Jieħu n-nar malajr ħafna, R12
nl: Zeer licht ontvlambaar, R12
no: Ekstremt brannfarlig, R12
pl: Produkt skrajnie łatwopalny, R12
pt: Extremamente inflamável, R12
sk: Mimoriadne horl’avý, R12
sl: Zelo lahko vnetljivo, R12
sv: Extremt brandfarligt, R12

de: Reagiert heftig mit Wasser, R14
en: Reacts violently with water, R14
cs: Prudce reaguje s vodou, R14
dk: Reagerer voldsomt med vand, R14
el: Αντιδρά βίαια µε νερό, R14
es: Reacciona violentamente con el agua, R14
et: Reageerib ägedalt veega, R14
fi: Reagoi voimakkaasti veden kanssa, R14
fr: Réagit violemment au contact de l'eau, R14
hu: Vízzel hevesen reagál, R14
it: Reagisce violentemente con l'acqua, R14
lt: Smarkiai reaguoja su vandeniu, R14
lv: Aktīvi reagē ar ūdeni, R14
mt: Jirreaġixxi bil-qawwa meta jmiss l-ilma, R14
nl: Reageert heftig met water, R14
no: Reagerer voldsomt med vann, R14
pl: Reaguje gwałtownie z wodą, R14
pt: Reage violentamente em contacto com a água, R14
sk: Prudko reaguje s vodou, R14
sl: Burno reagira z vodo, R14
sv: Reagerar häftigt med vatten, R14

de: Reagiert heftig mit Wasser unter Bildung hochentzündlicher Gase, R14/15
en: Reacts violently with water\, liberating extremely flammable gases, R14/15
cs: Prudce reaguje s vodou za uvolňování extrémně hořlavých plynů, R14/15
dk: Reagerer voldsomt med vand under dannelse af yderst brandfarlige gasser, R14/15
el: Αντιδρά βίαια σε επαφή µε νερό εκλύοντας αέρια εξόχως εύφλεκτα, R14/15
es: Reacciona violentamente con el agua\, liberando gases estremadamente inflamables, R14/15
et: Reageerib ägedalt veega\, eraldades väga tuleohtlikku gaasi, R14/15
fi: Reagoi voimakkaasti veden kanssa vapauttaen helposti syttyviä kaasuja, R14/15
fr: Réagit violemment au contact de l'eau en dégageant des gaz extrêmement inflammables, R14/15
hu: Vízzel hevesen reagál és közben fokozottan tűzveszélyes gázok képződnek, R14/15
it: Reagisce violentemente con l'acqua liberando gas estremamente infiammabili, R14/15
lt: Smarkiai reaguoja su vandeniu\, išskirdama ypač degias dujas, R14/15
lv: Aktīvi reagē ar ūdeni\, izdalot īpaši viegli uzliesmojošas gāzes, R14/15
mt: Jirreaġixxi b'mod vjolenti meta jmiss l-ilma billi jitfa' gassijiet li jieħdu n-nar malajr ħafna, R14/15
nl: Reageert heftig met water en vormt daarbij zeer ontvlambaar gas, R14/15
no: Reagerer voldsomt med vann under dannelse av meget brannfarlige gasser, R14/15
pl: Reaguje gwałtownie z wodą uwalniając skrajnie łatwopalne gazy, R14/15
pt: Reage violentamente com a água libertando gases extremamente inflamáveis, R14/15
sk: Prudko reaguje s vodou\, pričom uvol’ňuje mimoriadne horl’avé plyny, R14/15
sl: Burno reagira z vodo\, pri čemer se sprošča zelo lahko vnetljiv plin, R14/15
sv: Reagerar häftigt med vatten varvid extremt brandfarliga gaser bildas, R14/15

de: Reagiert mit Wasser unter Bildung hochentzündlicher Gase, R15
en: Contact with water liberates extremely flammable gases, R15
cs: Při styku s vodou uvolňuje extrémně hořlavé plyny, R15
dk: Reagerer med vand under dannelse af yderst brandfarlige gasser, R15
el: Σε επαφή µε το νερό εκλύει εξαιρετικά εύφλεκτα αέρια, R15
es: Reacciona con el agua liberando gases extremadamente inflamables, R15
et: Kokkupuutel veega eraldub väga tuleohtlik gaas, R15
fi: Vapauttaa erittäin helposti syttyviä kaasuja veden kanssa, R15
fr: Au contact de l'eau\, dégage des gaz extrêmement inflammables, R15
hu: Vízzel érintkezve fokozottan tűzveszélyes gázok képződnek, R15
it: A contatto con l'acqua libera gas estremamente infiammabili, R15
lt: Reaguoja su vandeniu\, išskirdama ypač degias dujas, R15
lv: Saskaroties ar ūdeni\, izdala īpaši viegli uzliesmojošas gāzes, R15
mt: Kuntatt ma' l-ilma joħroġ gassijiet li jieħdu n-nar malajr ħafna, R15
nl: Vormt zeer licht ontvlambaar gas in contact met water, R15
no: Reagerer med vann under dannelse av meget brannfarlige gasser, R15
pl: W kontakcie z wodą uwalnia skrajnie łatwopalne gazy, R15
pt: Em contacto com a água liberta gases extremamente inflamáveis, R15
sk: Pri kontakte s vodou sa uvol’ňujú mimoriadne horl’avé plyny, R15
sl: V stiku z vodo se sproščajo zelo lahko vnetljivi plini, R15
sv: Vid kontakt med vatten bildas extremt brandfarliga gaser, R15

de: Reagiert mit Wasser unter Bildung giftiger und hochentzündlicher Gase, R15/29
en: Contact with water liberates toxic\, extremely flammable gas, R15/29
cs: Při styku s vodou uvolňuje toxický \, extrémně hořlavý plyn, R15/29
dk: Reagerer med vand under dannelse af giftige og yderst brandfarlige gasser, R15/29
el: Σε επαφή µε νερό ελευθερώνονται τοξικά\, εξόχως εύφλεκτα αέρια, R15/29
es: En contacto con el agua\, libera gases tóxicos y estremadamente inflamables, R15/29
et: Kokkupuutel veega eraldub mürgine\, väga tuleohtlik gaas, R15/29
fi: Vapauttaa myrkyllisiä\, helposti syttyviä kaasuja veden kanssa, R15/29
fr: Au contact de l'eau\, dégage des gaz toxiques et extrêmement inflammables, R15/29
hu: Vízzel érintkezve fokozottan tűzveszélyes és mérgező gázok képződnek, R15/29
it: A contatto con acqua libera gas tossici ed estremamente infiammabili, R15/29
lt: Reaguoja su vandeniu\, išskirdama toksiškas ir ypač degias dujas, R15/29
lv: Saskaroties ar ūdeni\, izdala īpaši viegli uzliesmojošas toksiskas gāzes, R15/29
mt: Meta jmiss l-ilma jitfa' gassijiet tossiċi u li jieħdu n-nar malajr hafna, R15/29
nl: Vormt vergiftig en zeer ontvlambaar gas in contact met water, R15/29
no: Reagerer med vann under dannelse av giftige og meget brannfarlige gasser, R15/29
pl: W kontakcie z wodą uwalnia skrajnie łatwopalne\, toksyczne gazy, R15/29
pt: Em contacto com a água liberta gases tóxicos e extremamente inflamáveis, R15/29
sk: Pri kontakte s vodou sa uvol’ňuje jedovatý \, mimoriadne horl’avý plyn, R15/29
sl: V stiku z vodo se sprošča strupen\, zelo lahko vnetljiv plin, R15/29
sv: Utvecklar giftig och extremt brandfarlig gas vid kontakt med vatten, R15/29

de: Explosionsgefährlich in Mischung mit brandfördernden Stoffen, R16
en: Explosive when mixed with oxidising substances, R16
cs: Výbušný při smíchání s oxidačními látkami, R16
dk: Eksplosionsfarlig ved blanding med oxiderende stoffer, R16
el: Εκρηκτικό όταν αναµιχθεί µε οξειδωτικές ουσίες, R16
es: Puede explosionar en mezcla con substancias comburentes, R16
et: Plahvatusohtlik segatult oksüdeerivate ainetega, R16
fi: Räjähtävää hapettavien aineiden kanssa, R16
fr: Peut exploser en mélange avec des substances comburantes, R16
hu: Oxidáló anyaggal keveredve robbanásveszélyes, R16
it: Pericolo di esplosione se mescolato con sostanze comburenti, R16
lt: Gali sprogti sumaišyta su oksiduojančiomis medžiagomis, R16
lv: Sprāgst\, saskaroties ar oksidētājiem, R16
mt: Jista' jisplodi meta jitħallat ma' sustanzi li jsaddu, R16
nl: Ontploffingsgevaar bij menging met oxyderende stoffen, R16
no: Eksplosjonsfarlig ved blanding med oksiderende stoffer, R16
pl: Produkt wybuchowy po zmieszaniu z substancjami utleniają- cymi, R16
pt: Explosivo quando misturado com substâncias comburentes, R16
sk: Výbušný po zmiešaní s oxidujúcimi látkami, R16
sl: Eksplozivno v mešanici z oksidativnimi snovmi, R16
sv: Explosivt vid blandning med oxiderande ämnen, R16

de: Selbstentzündlich an der Luft, R17
en: Spontaneously flammable in air, R17
cs: Samovznětlivý na vzduchu, R17
dk: Selvantændelig i luft, R17
el: Αυτοαναφλέγεται στον αέρα, R17
es: Se inflama espontáneamente en contacto con el aire, R17
et: Isesüttiv õhu käes, R17
fi: Itsestään syttyvää ilmassa, R17
fr: Spontanément inflammable à l'air, R17
hu: Levegőn öngyulladó, R17
it: Spontaneamente infiammabile all'aria, R17
lt: Savaime užsideganti ore, R17
lv: Spontāni uzliesmo gaisā, R17
mt: Jaqbad waħdu fl-arja, R17
nl: Spontaan ontvlambaar in lucht, R17
no: Selvantennelig i luft, R17
pl: Samorzutnie zapala się w powietrzu, R17
pt: Espontaneamente inflamável ao ar, R17
sk: Vznietivý na vzduchu, R17
sl: Samovnetljivo na zraku, R17
sv: Självantänder i luft, R17

de: Bei Gebrauch Bildung explosionsfähiger/leichtentzündlicher Dampf/Luft-Gemische möglich, R18
en: In use\, may form flammable/explosive vapour-air mixture, R18
cs: Při používání může vytvářet hořlavé nebo výbušné směsi par se vzduchem, R18
dk: Ved brug kan brandbare dampe/eksplosive damp-luftblandinger dannes, R18
el: Κατά τη χρήση µπορεί να σχηµατίσει εύφλεκτα/εκρηκτικά µείγµατα ατµού-αέρος, R18
es: Al usarlo pueden formarse mezclas aire-vapor explosivas/inflamables, R18
et: Kasutamisel võib moodustuda tule-/plahvatusohtlik auru-õhu segu, R18
fi: Käytössä voi muodostua syttyvä/räjähtävä höyry-ilmaseos, R18
fr: Lors de l'utilisation\, formation possible de mélange vapeur-air inflammable/explosif, R18
hu: A használat során robbanásveszélyes/tűzveszélyes gáz-levegő elegy keletkezhet, R18
it: Durante l'uso può formare con aria miscele esplosive/infiammabili, R18
lt: Naudojama gali sudaryti degius (sprogius) garų (oro) mišinius, R18
lv: Izmantojot var veidot uzliesmojošu vai sprādzienbīstamu tvaiku un gaisa maisījumu, R18
mt: Meta jintuża jista' jifforma taħlitiet esplussivi jew li jaqbdu jekk jitħallat ma' l-arja, R18
nl: Kan bij gebruik een ontvlambaar/ontplofbaar damp-luchtmengsel vormen, R18
no: Ved bruk kan brennbare damper/eksplosive damp-luft blandinger dannes, R18
pl: Podczas stosowania mogą powstawać łatwopalne lub wybuchowe mieszaniny par z powietrzem, R18
pt: Pode formar mistura vapor-ar explosiva/inflamável durante a utilização, R18
sk: Pri použití môže vytvárat’ horl’avé/výbušné zmesi pár so vzduchom, R18
sl: Pri uporabi lahko tvori vnetljivo/eksplozivno zmes hlapi-zrak, R18
sv: Vid användning kan brännbara/explosiva ång-luftblandningar bildas, R18

de: Kann explosionsfähige Peroxide bilden, R19
en: May form explosive peroxides, R19
cs: Může vytvářet výbušné peroxidy, R19
dk: Kan danne eksplosive peroxider, R19
el: Μπορεί να σχηµατίσει εκρηκτικά υπεροξείδια, R19
es: Puede formar peróxidos explosivos, R19
et: Võib moodustada plahvatusohtlikke peroksiide, R19
fi: Saattaa muodostaa räjähtäviä peroksideja, R19
fr: Peut former des peroxydes explosifs, R19
hu: Robbanásveszélyes peroxidokat képezhet, R19
it: Può formare perossidi esplosivi, R19
lt: Gali sudaryti sprogstamuosius peroksidus, R19
lv: Var veidot sprādzienbīstamus peroksīdus, R19
mt: Jista' jifforma perossidi esplussivi, R19
nl: Kan ontplofbare peroxiden vormen, R19
no: Kan danne eksplosive peroksider, R19
pl: Może tworzyć wybuchowe nadtlenki, R19
pt: Pode formar peróxidos explosivos, R19
sk: Môže vytvárat’ výbušné peroxidy, R19
sl: Lahko tvori eksplozivne perokside, R19
sv: Kan bilda explosiva peroxider, R19

de: Durch Schlag\, Reibung\, Feuer oder andere Zündquellen explosionsgefährlich, R2
en: Risk of explosion by shock\, friction\, fire or other sources of ignition, R2
cs: Nebezpečí výbuchu při úderu\, tření\, ohni nebo působením jiných zdrojů zapálení, R2
dk: Eksplosionsfarlig ved stød\, gnidning\, ild eller andre antændelseskilder, R2
el: Κίνδυνος εκρήξεως από κρούση\, τριβή\, φωτιά ή άλλες πηγές ανα- φλέξεως, R2
es: Riesgo de explosión por choque\, fricción\, fuego u otras fuentes de ignición, R2
et: Plahvatusohtlik löögi\, hõõrdumise\, tule või muu süttimisallika toimel, R2
fi: Räjähtävää iskun\, hankauksen\, avotulen tai muun sytytyslähteen vaikutuksesta, R2
fr: Risque d'explosion par le choc\, la friction\, le feu ou d'autres sources d'ignition, R2
hu: Ütés\, súrlódás\, tűz vagy más gyújtóforrás robbanást okozhat, R2
it: Rischio di esplosione per urto\, sfregamento\, fuoco o altre sorgenti d'ignizione, R2
lt: Sprogimo rizika nuo smūgio\, trinties\, ugnies ar kitų uždegimo šaltinių, R2
lv: Sprādziena risks trieciena\, berzes\, liesmas vai cita aizdedzināšanas avota iedarbībā, R2
mt: Riskju ta' splużjoni minn xokk\, frizzjoni\, nar jew għejun oħra ta' qbid tan-nar, R2
nl: Ontploffingsgevaar door schok\, wrijving\, vuur of andere ontstekingsoorzaken, R2
no: Eksplosjonsfarlig ved støt\, gnidning\, ild eller andre antennelseskilder, R2
pl: Zagrożenie wybuchem wskutek uderzenia\, tarcia\, kontaktu z ogniem lub innymi źródłami zapłonu, R2
pt: Risco de explosão por choque\, fricção\, fogo ou outras fontes de ignição, R2
sk: Riziko výbuchu nárazom\, trením\, horením alebo inými zdrojmi zapálenia, R2
sl: Nevarnost eksplozije ob udarcu\, trenju\, požaru ali drugih virih vžiga, R2
sv: Explosivt vid stöt\, friktion\, eld eller annan antändningsorsak, R2

es: Nocivo
en: Harmful
da: Sundhedsskadelig
de: Gesundheitsschädlich
el: Επιβλαβές
fi: Haitallinen
fr: Nocif
it: Nocivo
nl: Schadelijk
pt: Nocivo
sv: Hälsoskadlig

de: Gesundheitsschädlich beim Einatmen, R20
en: Harmful by inhalation, R20
cs: Zdraví škodlivý při vdechování, R20
dk: Farlig ved indånding, R20
el: Επιβλαβές όταν εισπνέεται, R20
es: Nocivo por inhalación, R20
et: Kahjulik sissehingamisel, R20
fi: Terveydelle haitallista hengitettynä, R20
fr: Nocif par inhalation, R20
hu: Belélegezve ártalmas, R20
it: Nocivo per inalazione, R20
lt: Kenksminga įkvėpus, R20
lv: Kaitīgs ieelpojot, R20
mt: Jagħmel ħsara meta jinxtamm, R20
nl: Schadelijk bij inademing, R20
no: Farlig ved innånding, R20
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe, R20
pt: Nocivo por inalação, R20
sk: Škodlivý pri vdýchnutí, R20
sl: Zdravju škodljivo pri vdihavanju, R20
sv: Farligt vid inandning, R20

de: Gesundheitsschädlich beim Einatmen und bei Berührung mit der Haut, R20/21
en: Harmful by inhalation and in contact with skin, R20/21
cs: Zdraví škodlivý při vdechování a při styku s kůží, R20/21
dk: Farlig ved indånding og ved hudkontakt, R20/21
el: Επιβλαβές όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R20/21
es: Nocivo por inhalación y en contacto con la piel, R20/21
et: Kahjulik sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R20/21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R20/21
fr: Nocif par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R20/21
hu: Belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve ártalmas, R20/21
it: Nocivo per inalazione e contatto con la pelle, R20/21
lt: Kenksminga įkvėpus ir susilietus su oda, R20/21
lv: Kaitīgs ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R20/21
mt: Jagħmel ħsara meta jinxtamm u meta jmiss il-ġilda, R20/21
nl: Schadelijk bij inademing en bij aanraking met de huid, R20/21
no: Farlig ved innånding og hudkontakt, R20/21
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą, R20/21
pt: Nocivo por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R20/21
sk: Škodlivý pri vdý chnutí a pri kontakte s pokožkou, R20/21
sl: Zdravju škodljivo pri vdihavanju in v stiku s kožo, R20/21
sv: Farligt vid inandning\, hudkontakt och förtäring, R20/21